Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Fire Protection Grading Districts

§ 19-5-215.
Fire protection grading districts.

Any contiguous area situated within any county of the state, and not being situated within the corporate boundaries of any existing municipality, may become incorporated as a fire protection grading district solely for the purpose of grading by the Mississippi Rating Bureau for fire protection classification in the manner set forth in the following sections.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 387, § 1, eff from and after July 27, 1992 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to this amendment).

§ 19-5-217.
Petition for incorporation.

A petition for the incorporation of such a district may be submitted to the board of supervisors of the county, signed by not less than twenty-five (25) owners of real property residing within the boundaries of the proposed district. Such petition shall include: (a) a statement of the necessity for the proposed district to establish legally recognized boundaries solely for fire protection grading purposes; (b) the proposed corporate name for the district; and (c) the proposed boundaries of the district.

Such petition shall be signed in person by the petitioners, with their respective residence addresses, and shall be accompanied by a sworn statement of the person or persons circulating the petition, who shall state under oath that he or they witnessed the signature of each petitioner, that each signature is the signature of the person it purports to be, and that, to the best of his or their knowledge, each petitioner was at the time of signing an owner of real property within and a resident of the proposed district.

The board of supervisors of a county, in its discretion, may initiate the incorporation of a district by resolution of the board and presentation of a petition signed by at least twenty-five (25) property owners of the area to be incorporated if at least forty (40) property owners reside within the district.

With respect to the incorporation of a fire protection grading district in accordance with Sections 19-5-215 through 19-5-241, the word “owners” shall include any lessees of real property the term of whose original lease is not less than sixty (60) years and shall also include sublessees if the original lease of which they are subletting is not less than sixty (60) years.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 387, § 2, eff from and after July 27, 1992 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to this amendment).

§ 19-5-219.
Hearing; findings; resolution of intent.

Upon the filing of such petition, or upon the adoption of a resolution declaring the intent of the board of supervisors to incorporate such district, it shall then be the duty of the board of supervisors of such county to fix a time and place for a public hearing upon the question of the public convenience and necessity of the incorporation of the proposed district solely for fire protection grading purposes. The date fixed for such hearing shall be not more than thirty (30) days after the filing of the petition, and the date of the hearing, the place at which it shall be held, the proposed boundaries of the district and the purpose of the hearing shall be set forth in a notice to be signed by the clerk of the board of supervisors of such county. Such notice shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation within such proposed district once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks before the date of such hearing. The first such publication shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days before the date of such hearing and the last such publication shall be made not more than fourteen (14) days before the date of such hearing.

If, at such public hearing, the board of supervisors finds that the public convenience and necessity require the creation of the fire protection grading district to enable the Mississippi State Rating Bureau to grade the district according to its fire insurance grading schedule, the board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution making such findings and declaring its intention to create the district on a date to be specified in such resolution. Such resolution shall also designate the name of the proposed district and define its territorial limits, which shall be fixed by the board in accordance with such hearing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 387, § 3, eff from and after July 27, 1992 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to this amendment).

§ 19-5-221.
Publication of resolution of intent.

A certified copy of the resolution so adopted shall be published in a newspaper having a general circulation within such proposed district once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks before the date specified in the resolution as the date upon which the board intends to create such district. The first such publication shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days before the date specified, and the last such publication shall be made not more than fourteen (14) days before such date. If twenty percent (20%) or one hundred fifty (150), whichever is the lesser, of the qualified electors of such proposed district file a written petition with such board of supervisors on or before the date specified as the date of creation of the district protesting against creation of such district, the board of supervisors shall call an election on the question of creation of such district. Procedure for the election should conform to the guidelines set forth in Section 19-5-157.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 387, § 4, eff from and after July 27, 1992 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to this amendment).

§ 19-5-223.
Resolution creating district.

If no petition requiring an election be filed or if three-fifths of those voting in such election vote in favor of the creation of such district, the board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution creating the district as desired in the resolution of intention.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 387, § 5, eff from and after July 27, 1992 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to this amendment).

§ 19-5-225.
Costs; bond.

All costs incident to the publication of the notices and all other costs incident to the public hearing and election shall be paid by the board of supervisors, in its discretion, or shall be borne by the parties filing the petition. The board of supervisors, in its discretion, may require the execution of a cost bond by the parties filing the petition. Such bond shall be in the amount and with good sureties to guarantee the payment of such costs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 387, § 6, eff from and after July 27, 1992 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to this amendment).

§ 19-5-227.
Appeal to circuit court.

Any party having an interest in the subject matter and aggrieved or prejudiced by the findings and adjudication of the board of supervisors may appeal to the circuit court of the county in the manner provided by law for appeals from orders of the board of supervisors. However, if no such appeal be taken within a period of fifteen (15) days from and after the date of the adoption of the resolution creating any such district, the creation of such district shall be final and conclusive and shall not thereafter be subject to attack in any court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 387, § 7, eff from and after July 27, 1992 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to this amendment).

§ 19-5-229.
District embracing lands in more than one county.

A fire protection grading district embracing lands in more than one (1) county may be created by the following procedure:

The portion of a proposed district containing the largest area of land shall be first created into a district by the board of supervisors of the county in which such largest portion is situated, such county to be known as the “incorporating county.”

The resolution first creating such district shall include the exact boundaries of the lands situated in the incorporating county and shall include the exact boundaries of the contiguous area in other counties to be included in the district.

The resolution by the incorporating county shall designate the official name of the district.

The resolution adopted by the board of supervisors of any county desiring to include contiguous lands into a district initially created as outlined above shall contain exact and identical provisions to those in the resolution by the board of supervisors of the incorporating county.

The board of supervisors of the incorporating county, within sixty (60) days after the adoption of a resolution or resolutions by the board of supervisors of adjoining counties to enter lands into the district, shall enter an order on its minutes acknowledging, affirming and adjudicating the incorporation of the district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 387, § 8, eff from and after July 27, 1992 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to this amendment).

§ 19-5-231.
District as governmental entity.

From and after the date of the adoption of the resolution creating any such district, such district shall be a governmental entity of the incorporating county in perpetuity under its corporate name and the supervisors, in that name, shall exercise responsibilities as required by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 387, § 9, eff from and after July 27, 1992 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to this amendment).

§ 19-5-233.
Board of supervisors to act on behalf of district.

The board of supervisors shall act on behalf of the district and may exercise any of the powers granted under the provisions of Sections 19-5-215 through 19-5-241. The board of supervisors shall record any such actions in its minutes, conducting such business during any public meeting of that body.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 387, § 10, eff from and after July 27, 1992 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to this amendment).

§ 19-5-235.
Powers of district.

Any fire protection grading district, acting by and through the board of supervisors on behalf of such district as its governing authority, shall have the following among other powers granted to the board of supervisors:

To sue and be sued;

To acquire by purchase, gift, devise and lease or any other mode of acquisition, hold and dispose of real and personal property of every kind within or without the district;

To make and enter into contracts, conveyances, mortgages, deeds of trust, bonds, leases or contracts for financial advisory services;

To incur debts, to borrow money, to issue negotiable bonds and to provide for the rights of the holders thereof;

To pledge revenues to the payment of its obligations;

To use any right-of-way, public right-of-way, easement or other similar property or property rights necessary or convenient in connection with the acquisition, improvement, operation or maintenance of the facilities of fire protection providers serving such district held by the state or any political subdivision thereof; however, the governing body of such political subdivision shall consent to such use; and

To enter into agreements with state and federal agencies for loans, grants, grants-in-aid and other forms of assistance, including but not limited to participation in the sale and purchase of bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 387, § 11, eff from and after July 27, 1992 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to this amendment).

§ 19-5-237.
Exercise of eminent domain.

The board of supervisors of such county may exercise the power of eminent domain on behalf of the district wherever and whenever public necessity and convenience so require.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 387, § 12, eff from and after July 27, 1992 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to this amendment).

§ 19-5-239.
Annexation of area adjacent to district.

Any area adjacent to any district created under Sections 19-5-215 through 19-5-241 and situated within the same county as the district, and not being situated within the corporate boundaries of any existing municipality, may be annexed to and become a part of such district by the same procedure prescribed in Sections 19-5-215 through 19-5-241 for the original creation of the district. All costs incident to the publication of notice and all other costs incident to the hearings, election and proceedings shall be paid by the board of supervisors.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 387, § 13, eff from and after July 27, 1992 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to this amendment).

§ 19-5-241.
Agreements with or aid and cooperation of state or federal government.

The board of supervisors creating any such district shall have the authority to enter into cooperative agreements with the state or federal government or both; to obtain financial assistance in the form of loans or grants as may be available from the state or federal government, or both. It is the purpose and intention of this section to authorize districts to do any and all things necessary to secure the financial aid or cooperation of the state or federal government.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 387, § 14, eff from and after July 27, 1992 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to this amendment).